Washington statutes.
RCW 18.52.010

Short title—Intent.

This chapter shall be known as the "Nursing Home Administrator Licensing Act" and is intended to establish and provide for the enforcement of standards for the licensing of nursing home administrators. The legislature finds that the quality of patient care in nursing homes is directly related to the competence of the nursing home administrators. It is the intent of this chapter that licensed nursing home administrators continually maintain (1) the suitable character required and (2) the capacity to consider the available resources and personnel of the facility subject to their authority and come to reasonable decisions implementing patient care.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 243 s 1; 1970 ex.s. c 57 s 1.]